Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF810.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 5 TLSB 2174YH (6) 91 jm/md H.F. 810 Section 1. Section 257.31, subsection 5, paragraph o, Code 1 2025, is amended to read as follows: 2 o. (1) The percentage of students enrolled in the school 3 district as the result of open enrollment under section 4 282.18 is equal to or greater than forty-five percent of the 5 total number of students enrolled in the school district. 6 The committee shall not approve supplemental aid or a 7 modified supplemental amount that exceeds an amount equal 8 to fifty percent of the product of the net change in the 9 school districtâs expected enrollment due to open enrollment 10 multiplied by the sum of the following amounts: 11 (a) The difference between the districtâs regular program 12 district cost per pupil minus the regular program state cost 13 per pupil. 14 (b) The teacher salary supplement district cost per pupil. 15 (c) (b) The professional development supplement district 16 cost per pupil. 17 (d) (c) The early intervention supplement district cost per 18 pupil. 19 (2) Prior to filing a request for supplemental aid or a 20 modified supplemental amount based on the grounds specified 21 in this paragraph, the board of directors shall hold a public 22 hearing on the issue and shall publish the notice of the time 23 and place of the public hearing. Notice of the time and place 24 of the public hearing shall be published not less than ten nor 25 more than twenty days before the public hearing in a newspaper 26 that is a newspaper of general circulation in the school 27 district. 28 (3) A school district is not eligible for supplemental aid 29 or a modified supplemental amount under this paragraph if a 30 majority of the students enrolled in the school district as 31 the result of open enrollment are students receiving online 32 instruction from a private provider under section 256.43, 33 subsection 2 . 34 (4) A school district is only eligible for supplemental 35 -1- LSB 2174YH (6) 91 jm/md 1/ 3 H.F. 810 aid or a modified supplemental amount under this paragraph for 1 the budget year beginning July 1, 2024 If a school district is 2 granted a modified supplemental amount under this paragraph for 3 a budget year beginning on or after July 1, 2025, the school 4 districtâs combined property tax rate per one thousand dollars 5 for all school district levies for the succeeding budget year 6 shall not exceed the combined property tax rate for all such 7 levies for the budget year for which the modified supplemental 8 amount was granted . 9 Sec. 2. REPEAL. 2024 Iowa Acts, chapter 1152, section 45, 10 is repealed. 11 Sec. 3. EFFECTIVE DATE. This Act, being deemed of immediate 12 importance, takes effect upon enactment. 13 Sec. 4. APPLICABILITY. This Act applies to school budget 14 years beginning on or after July 1, 2025. 15